case.che.lexd
LEXICON Case

# Ergative
<erg>:а[Pl_sh,erg_a]          
<erg>:{obl}с[erg_s]                   
<erg>:о[Adj_ch,erg_o]           
<erg>:е       

# Genitive
<gen>:{obl}н[Pl_j,Num,Adj_u,gen] 

# Dative
<dat>:на[Pl_sh,Num,Adj_un,dat]  

# Instrumentalis
<ins>:ца[Pl_sh,Num_n,Adj_upn,ins] 


# вещественный = locative
<loc>:{obllight}х[Pl_e,Pl_j,Num,Adj_u,loc]     
<loc>:{obllight}ха[Pl_e,Pl_j,Num,Adj_u,loc]   # Jakovlev 1960: derivated form

# местный = allative
<all>:га[all_der,Num_n,Adj_upn,all_ga]
<all>:ка[all_der,Pl_sh]                       # plural only
<all>:е[all_der,all_e]                       
<all>:а[all_der,all_a]

# сравнительный = comparative
<comp>:{obl}л[Pl_j,Pl_e,Num,Adj_u,comp] 
<comp>:{obl}ла[Pl_j,Pl_e,Num,comp,comp_la]    # Jakovlev 1960: derivated form
<comp>:{obl}лла[Pl_j,Pl_e,Num,Adj_u,comp]  	  # Jakovlev 1960: derivated form 

LEXICON AllDer # case glosses correspond to                                                                   Nichols 1994
<location>:хь
<direction>:хьа
<source>:{obl}ра       
<across>:хула

LEXICON AllDer1
<direction>:хьа

LEXICON AllDer2
<source>:{obl}ра   
<across>:хула

LEXICON Plural
<pl>:е[Pl_e]
<pl>:{obllight}ш[Pl_sh]  
<pl>:{obl}й[Pl_j]            

# РОД
LEXICON NounClass
<cl1>:й #f+sg
<cl2>:б #pl
<cl3>:в #m+sg
<cl4>:д #pl
